Illinois, session 104th, SB4185.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rare Disease Commission Act is amended by 5changing Sections 20 and 90 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 445/20)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 20. Administrative support. The Department of Public 9Health shall provide administrative and other support to the 10Commission, including, but not limited to, printing services 11related to the distribution of the Commission's annual report.12(Source: P.A. 99-773, eff. 1-1-17.) 13    (410 ILCS 445/90)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)15    Sec. 90. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 2032 162027.17(Source: P.A. 101-606, eff. 12-13-19; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.